src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON CNAME_ODD ! Names ending in stressless vowel
                         CNAME_ODD_SG      ; ! name special
             +Pl:        CNAME_ODD_PL      ; ! name special
                         N_ODD_ESS         ; ! normal noun
           +Attr:        FINAL1            ; ! name special

LEXICON CNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG_FLAG @U.Cap.Obl@ CNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG ;
LEXICON CNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG ! Names ending in stressless vowel
                         CNAME_ODD_SG      ; ! name special
! +Pl: CNAME_ODD_PL ;     ! name special
                         N_ODD_ESS         ; ! normal noun
           +Attr:        FINAL1            ; ! name special

LEXICON CNAME_ODD_SG
         +Sg+Nom:        FINAL1            ;
+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:e       FINAL1            ;	!Ibsene, norm?
      +Cmp/SgNom:         RHyph             ;
      +Cmp/SgGen:         RHyph             ;
         +Sg+Acc:e%>m    FINAL1            ;
         +Sg+Gen:e%>n    FINAL1            ;
         +Sg+Ill:%>asse  FINAL1            ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
         +Sg+Ine:%>isnie FINAL1            ;
         +Sg+Ela:%>istie FINAL1            ;
         +Sg+Com:%>inie  FINAL1            ;

LEXICON CNAME_ODD_PL
         +Nom:%>h       FINAL1 ;
         +Acc:%>idie    FINAL1 ;
         +Gen:%>i       FINAL1 ;
         +Ill:%>idie    FINAL1 ;
         +Ine:%>inie    FINAL1 ;
         +Ela:%>ijstie  FINAL1 ;
         +Com:%>igujmie FINAL1 ;
 +Com+Err/Orth:%>igyjmie FINAL1 ; !
 
LEXICON GIRUNA-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: GIRUNA ;
LEXICON GIRUNA
         +Sg+Nom:a       FINAL1            ;
         +Sg+Acc:a%>m    FINAL1            ;
         +Sg+Gen:a%>n    FINAL1            ;
         +Sg+Ill:%>asse  FINAL1            ; 
         +Sg+Ine:%>isnie FINAL1            ;
         +Sg+Ela:%>istie FINAL1            ;
         +Sg+Com:%>inie  FINAL1            ;
         +Ess:%>inie  FINAL1            ;

!LEXICON CNAME_ODD-LOAN ! Names ending in stressless vowel
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom:         FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:         RHyph ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc:e%>m      FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen:e%>n      FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill:%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine:%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela:%>istie           FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
!! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl: CNAME_ODD_PL ;     ! name special
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:    N_ODD_ESS ;    ! normal noun
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Attr: FINAL1 ;     ! name special
!

!LEXICON CNAME_EVEN-sur ! generates
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: CNAME_EVENLEX_FLAG ;

!LEXICON CNAME_EVEN-mal ! generates
! +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: CNAME_EVENLEX_FLAG ;

!LEXICON CNAME_EVEN-fem ! generates
! +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: CNAME_EVENLEX_FLAG ;

!LEXICON CNAME_EVEN-org
! +N+Prop+Sem/Org: CNAME_EVENLEX_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;

LEXICON CNAME_EVEN-plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: CNAME_EVENLEX_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;

!LEXICON CNAME_EVEN-obj
! +N+Prop+Sem/Obj: CNAME_EVENLEX_FLAG ;

LEXICON CNAME_EVEN-ani
 +N+Prop+Sem/Ani: CNAME_EVENLEX_FLAG ;

LEXICON CNAME_EVENLEX_FLAG @U.Cap.Obl@ CNAME_EVENLEX ;
LEXICON CNAME_EVENLEX
        CNAME_EVEN_SG ;
   +Pl: NIEJTE_PL     ;
        EVEN_ESS      ;
 +Attr: FINAL1        ;

LEXICON CNAME_EVENLEX_PLC-ORG_FLAG @U.Cap.Obl@ CNAME_EVENLEX_PLC-ORG ;
LEXICON CNAME_EVENLEX_PLC-ORG
                CNAME_EVEN_SG ;
!+Pl: NIEJTE_PL ;
                EVEN_ESS      ;
   +Attr:       FINAL1        ;


  LEXICON CNAME_EVEN_SG
 +Sg+Nom:       FINAL1        ;
 +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:e       FINAL1        ; !Beckmane, norm?
 +Cmp/SgNom:    RHyph         ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:    RHyph         ;
 +Sg+Acc:e%>m   FINAL1        ;
 +Sg+Gen:e%>n   FINAL1        ;
 +Sg+Ill:e%>se  FINAL1        ;
 +Sg+Ine:e%>sne FINAL1        ;
 +Sg+Ela:e%>ste FINAL1        ;
 +Sg+Com:%>ine  FINAL1        ;


!LEXICON CNAME_EVEN-LOAN
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom:          FINAL1 ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:          RHyph ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc:e%>m       FINAL1 ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen:e%>n       FINAL1 ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill:e%>se      FINAL1 ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine:e%>sne     FINAL1 ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela:e%>ste     FINAL1 ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com:%>ine      FINAL1 ;
!!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl: NIEJTE_PL ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:     EVEN_ESS ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Attr: FINAL1 ;

!LEXICON SAAMI_CNAME_EVEN ! Names ending in stressless vowel
!@U.Cap.Obl@ SAAMI_CNAME_EVEN_INFL ;
!LEXICON SAAMI_CNAME_EVEN_INFL
!      +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:       SAAMI_CNAME_EVEN_SG ;
!   +N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl:       NIEJTE_PL           ;
!      +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:       EVEN_ESS            ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Attr:       FINAL1              ;

!  LEXICON SAAMI_CNAME_EVEN_SG
!              +Sg+Nom:       FINAL1              ;
!           +Cmp/SgNom:       RHyph               ;
!           +Cmp/SgGen:       RHyph               ;
!              +Sg+Nom:e      FINAL1              ;
!              +Sg+Nom:e      RHyph               ;
!              +Sg+Acc:e%>m   FINAL1              ;
!              +Sg+Gen:e%>n   FINAL1              ;
!              +Sg+Ill:e%>se  FINAL1              ;
!              +Sg+Ine:e%>sne FINAL1              ;
!              +Sg+Ela:e%>ste FINAL1              ;
!              +Sg+Com:%>ine  FINAL1              ;


LEXICON DÅERIES
@U.Cap.Obl@ DÅERIES_INFL ;
LEXICON DÅERIES_INFL
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom:ies             FINAL1    ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Cmp/SgNom:ies             RHyph     ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Cmp/SgGen:ies             RHyph     ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc:%^1UMLas%>am    FINAL1    ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen:%^1UMLas%>an    FINAL1    ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill:%^1UMLas%>asse  FINAL1    ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine:%^1UMLas%>isnie FINAL1    ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela:%^1UMLas%>istie FINAL1    ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com:%^1UMLas%>inie  FINAL1    ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom:%^1UMLas%>h       FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Acc:%^1UMLas%>idie            FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Gen:%^1UMLas%>i       FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill:%^1UMLas%>idie            FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ine:%^1UMLas%>inie            FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ela:%^1UMLas%>ijstie          FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Com:%^1UMLas%>igujmie FINAL1 ;
        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:ies             N_ODD_ESS ; ! normal noun
   +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Attr:ies             FINAL1    ; ! name special

LEXICON TJIRREDS
@U.Cap.Obl@ TJIRREDS_INFL ;
LEXICON TJIRREDS_INFL
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom:d%>%^DISIMPs  FINAL1    ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Cmp/SgNom:d%>%^DISIMPs  RHyph     ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Cmp/SgGen:d%>%^DISIMPs  RHyph     ;
              +A+Sg+Acc:de%>%^DISIMPm FINAL1    ;
              +A+Sg+Gen:de%>%^DISIMPn FINAL1    ;
              +A+Sg+Ill:d%>asse       FINAL1    ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
              +A+Sg+Ine:d%>isnie      FINAL1    ;
              +A+Sg+Ela:d%>istie      FINAL1    ;
              +A+Sg+Com:d%>inie       FINAL1    ;
!+A+Pl:d N_ODD_PL ;
                     +A:d             N_ODD_ESS ;
   +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Attr:d%>%^DISIMPs  FINAL1    ; ! name special

LEXICON BISSAU-plc
ACCRA-plc ;

LEXICON PERU-plc
NYSTØ-plc ;

!Reciprocal pronouns 

LEXICON flagK
@U.Cap.Obl@ K ;

LEXICON K
   FINAL1 ;
