src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun
Abingdon:Abingdon CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Agnefest:Agne^fest CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Aksnes:Aks^nes CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Allerød:Allerød CNAME_EVEN-plc ;
Alvsvåg:Alvs^våg CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Andermatt:Ander^matt CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Ankerheim:Anker^heim CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Arlington:Arlington CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Askersund:Asker^sund CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Audmax:Audmax CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Austfjordgrend:Aust^fjord^grend CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Badajoz:Badajoz CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Baldersheim:Balders^heim CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Barrios:Barri^os CNAME_EVEN-plc ;
Beelsebul:Beelsebul CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Bengtsfors:Bengts^fors CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Bethlehem:Bethle^hem CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Birobidzjan:Birobidzjan CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Bjåi:Bjåi CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Bjørnfjell:Bjørn^fjell CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Blokhus:Blokhus CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Bokerød:Bokerød CNAME_EVEN-plc ;
Borregård:Borre^gård CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Bramnes:Bramnes CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Bredal:Bre^dal CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Bremsteinvær:Brem^stein^vær CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Bronx:Bronx CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Bruravik:Brura^vik CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Bugøyfjord:Bug^øy^fjord CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Bygholm:Byg^holm CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Cairns:Cairns CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Celius:Celi^us CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Chenkiang:Chenki^ang CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Ciskei:Ciskei CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Cottbus:Cottbus CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Dalsgård:Dals^gård CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Delfzijl:Delfzijl CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Dion:Di^on CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Donets:Donets CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Drømtorp:Drømtorp CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Dypfest:Dyp^fest CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Dåeries:Dåer DÅERIES "62 TERRTX" ;
Edsbyn:Eds^byn CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Eidsvoll:Eids^voll CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Eitorn:Eitorn CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Elmadam:Elmadam CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Ems:Ems CNAME_EVEN-plc ;
Espenes:Espe^nes CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Faisalabad:Faisalabad CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Fiskebekk:Fiske^bekk CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Fleksnes:Fleks^nes CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Fort:Fort CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Frogn:Frogn CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Gandhinagar:Gandhinagar CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Gjervik:Gjer^vik CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Gregorius:Gregori^us CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Grønås:Grøn^ås CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Gårdsvoll:Gårds^voll CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Hamburg:Ham^burg CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Hatlestrand:Hatle^strand CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Heidmork:Heid^mork CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Hemmingsjord:Hemmings^jord CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Hinnerup:Hinnerup CNAME_EVEN-plc ;
Holmefjord:Holme^fjord CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Huascarán:Hu^ascarán CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Hässleholm:Hässle^holm CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Ilsvåg:Ils^våg CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Iskenderun:Iskenderun CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Jeroboam:Jerobo^am CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Kalundborg:Kalund^borg CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Kattegat:Kattegat CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Kirkefjord:Kirke^fjord CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Kjøsnes:Kjøs^nes CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Kongselv:Kongs^elv CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Kramfors:Kram^fors CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Kursk:Kursk CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Kværn:Kværn CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Landmark:Land^mark CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Leeuwenhoek:Leeuwenhoek CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Lianyungang:Li^an^yungang CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Liverpool:Liver^pool CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Lykurg:Lykurg CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Madurai:Madurai CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Marensius:Marensi^us CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Mauroy:Maur^oy CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Messenger:Messenger CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Mjønes:Mjø^nes CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Moursund:Mour^sund CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Møll:Møll CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Nervei:Ner^vei CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Norddal:Nord^dal CNAME_EVEN-plc ;
Nymfai:Nymfai CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Oldervik:Older^vik CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Ormazd:Ormazd CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Palembang:Palembang CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Pegasos:Pegasos CNAME_EVEN-ani ;
Pegasus:Pegasus CNAME_EVEN-ani ;
Perg:Perg CNAME_EVEN-plc ;
Pheiff:Pheiff CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Presthus:Presthus CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Ramsøy:Rams^øy CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Reykjanes:Reykja^nes CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Rosendal:Rosen^dal CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Ryskjær:Ry^skjær CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Saltrød:Saltrød CNAME_EVEN-plc ;
Sarpsborg:Sarps^borg CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Senegal:Senegal CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Sinkiang:Sinki^ang CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Skaugvoll:Skaug^voll CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Skorgenes:Skorge^nes CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Slørdal:Slør^dal CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Sostenes:Sostenes CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Stavnes:Stav^nes CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Stordal:Stor^dal CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Strokkur:Strokkur CNAME_EVEN-plc ;
Sundvoll:Sund^voll CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Svikebøl:Svikebøl CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Sømådal:Søm^å^dal CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Taksdal:Taks^dal CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Tessalonikas:Tessalonikas CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Tjirreds:Tjirrie TJIRREDS "13 TERRTX" ;
Tjørvåg:Tjør^våg CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Trankebar:Trankebar CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Tunsberghus:Tuns^berghus CNAME_EVEN-plc ;
Ulan:Ulan CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Utah:Utah CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Valset:Valset CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Venjaneset:Venja^neset CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Vilnius:Vilni^us CNAME_EVEN-plc ;
Västervik:Väster^vik CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Wintermark:Winter^mark CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Zagazig:Zagazig CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Åros:År^os CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Østergård:Øster^gård CNAME_EVEN-plc ; 
Torgfjord:Torgfjord CNAME_EVEN-plc ;
